Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; MINNESOTA ASSOCIATION OF BLACK LAWYERS.new text end new text begin (a) $350,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $350,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Minnesota Association of Black Lawyers to be used for a program supporting Black undergraduate students pursuing admission to law school. new text end new text begin (b) The program under paragraph (a) must: new text end new text begin (1) enroll Black Minnesota resident students attending a baccalaureate degree-granting postsecondary institution in Minnesota full-time; new text end new text begin (2) support each of the program's students with an academic scholarship in the amount of $4,000 per academic year; new text end new text begin (3) organize events and programming, including but not limited to one-on-one mentoring, to familiarize enrolled students with law school and legal careers; and new text end new text begin (4) provide the program's students free test preparation materials, academic support, and registration for the Law School Admission Test (LSAT) examination. new text end new text begin (c) The Minnesota Association of Black Lawyers may use grant money under paragraph (a) for costs related to: new text end new text begin (1) student scholarships; new text end new text begin (2) academic events and programming, including food and transportation costs for students; new text end new text begin (3) LSAT preparation materials, courses, and registrations; and new text end new text begin (4) hiring staff for the program. new text end new text begin (d) By January 30, 2026, and again by January 30, 2027, the Minnesota Association of Black Lawyers must submit a report to the commissioner of employment and economic development and to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over workforce development and policy. The report must include an accurate and detailed account of the program, the program's outcomes, and the program's revenues and expenses, including the use of all state money appropriated in paragraph (a). new text end